Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 19. Health, Safety, and Welfare
§ 21-19-15.
Enacting police regulations.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have power to make all needful police regulations necessary for the preservation of good order and peace of the municipality and to prevent injury to, destruction of, or interference with public or private property.

The governing authority of a municipality shall have the power to regulate or prohibit any mill, laundry or manufacturing plant from operating whereby the soot, cinders or smoke therefrom, or the unnecessary noises thereof, may do damage to or interfere with the use or occupation of public or private property.

The governing authority of a municipality shall have the power to prohibit or regulate the sale or use of firecrackers, roman candles, torpedoes, sky rockets, and any and all explosives commonly known and referred to as fireworks; the term “fireworks” shall not include toy pistols, toy canes, toy guns, other devices in which paper caps manufactured in accordance with United States Interstate Commerce Commission regulations for packing and shipping of toy paper caps are used, or toy pistol paper caps manufactured as provided herein, the sale and use of which shall be permitted at all times.

The governing authority of a municipality may enact an ordinance specifying the manner and means by which a motor vehicle may be immobilized due to failure of the record title owner of the motor vehicle to pay traffic or parking fines totaling over Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).

The governing authority of a municipality may enforce an ordinance regulating or restricting parking on any public street or roadway. However, signage that adequately describes the parking regulation or restriction must be posted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2938; 1906, § 3329; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5826; 1930, § 2406; 1942, § 3374-124; Laws, 1926, ch. 274; Laws, 1950, chs. 517, 491, § 124; Laws, 1952, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 21-19-17.
Restricting movements of individuals where public safety is endangered.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to make regulations to protect property, health and lives and to enhance the general welfare of the community by restricting the movements of the citizens, or any group thereof, of such municipalities when there is eminent danger to the public safety because of freedom of movement thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2950; 1906, § 3341; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5838; 1930, § 2417; 1942 § 3374-132; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 132; Laws, 1964, ch. 496, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1964).

§ 21-19-19.
Regulating blind-tigers and disreputable places and practices.

The governing authority of any municipality shall have the power to restrain, prohibit and suppress blind-tigers, bucket-shops, slaughterhouses, houses of prostitution, disreputable houses, hotels and motels renting rooms on an hourly basis, games and gambling houses and rooms, dance houses and rooms, keno rooms, and all kinds of indecency and other disorderly practices, and disturbance of the peace, and to provide for the punishment of the persons engaged therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2951; 1906, § 3342; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5839; 1930, § 2418; 1942, § 3374-133; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 133; Laws, 1986, ch. 302, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 416, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 21-19-20.
Proceedings to demolish or seize abandoned houses or buildings used for sale or use of drugs or constituting public hazard or nuisance; authority to sell, transfer, convey or use abandoned houses or buildings for suitable municipal purposes.

A municipality shall institute proceedings to have demolished or seized an abandoned house or building that is used for the sale or use of drugs. In addition, the governing authorities of a municipality may sell, transfer or otherwise convey or use an abandoned house or building for suitable municipal purposes. The local law enforcement authority of the municipality shall have documented proof of drug sales or use in the abandoned property before a municipality may initiate proceedings to have the property demolished or seized.

A municipality shall institute proceedings under this section to have an abandoned house or building demolished or seized if the governing authority of the municipality determines that the house or building is a menace to the public health and safety of the community and that it constitutes a public hazard and nuisance.

Upon the receipt of a petition requesting the municipality to demolish or seize an abandoned house or building that constitutes a public hazard and nuisance signed by a majority of the residents residing within four hundred (400) feet of the property, the governing authority of the municipality shall notify the property owner that the petition has been filed and that a date for a hearing on the petition has been set. Notice to the property owner shall be by United States mail, or if the property owner or the owner’s address is unknown, publication of the notice shall be made twice each week during two (2) successive weeks in a public newspaper of the county in which the municipality is located; where there is no newspaper in the county, the notice shall be published in a newspaper having a general circulation in the state. The hearing shall be held not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) days after service or completion of publication of the notice. At the hearing, the governing authority shall determine whether the property is a menace to the public health and safety of the community which constitutes a public hazard and nuisance. If the governing authority determines that the property is a public hazard and nuisance, the municipality shall institute proceedings under subsection (2) of this section to demolish or seize the abandoned house or building.

The municipality shall file a petition to declare the abandoned property a public hazard and nuisance and to have the property demolished or seized with the circuit clerk of the county in which the property or some part of the property is located. All of the owners of the property involved, and any mortgagee, trustee, or other person having any interest in or lien on the property shall be made defendants to the proceedings. The circuit clerk shall present the petition to the circuit judge who, by written order directed to the circuit clerk, shall fix the time and place for the hearing of the matter in termtime or vacation. The time of the hearing shall be fixed on a date to allow sufficient time for each defendant named to be served with process, as otherwise provided by law, not less than thirty (30) days before the hearing. If a defendant or other party in interest is not served for the specified time before the date fixed, the hearing shall be continued to a day certain to allow the thirty-day period specified.

Any cost incurred by a municipality under this section for demolishing or seizing abandoned property shall be paid by the owners of the property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 427, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 21-19-21.
Enacting fire regulations.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to establish fire limits, and to regulate, restrain, or prohibit the erection of buildings made of sheet iron, wood, or any combustible material, within such limits as may be prescribed by ordinance, and to provide for the removal of the same at the expense of the owner thereof when erected contrary to the ordinances of the municipality. Such authorities shall have the power to regulate and prevent the storing of green hides and the carrying on of manufactures dangerous in causing or producing fires, injurious to health, or obnoxious or offensive to the inhabitants. Such authorities shall have the power to regulate the storage of powder, pitch, turpentine, resin, hemp, hay, cotton, and all other combustible and inflammable materials, and the storage of lumber in yards or on lots within the fire limits or as may be prescribed by ordinance. Such authorities shall have the power to regulate the use of lights and candles in stables, shops, and other places. Such authorities shall have the power to remove or prevent the construction of any fireplace, chimney, stove, oven, boiler, kettle, or any apparatus used in any house, building, manufactory, or business which may be dangerous in causing or producing fires. Such authorities shall have the power to direct the safe construction of deposits for ashes. Such authorities shall have the power to enter into and examine all dwelling houses, lots, yards, inclosures, and buildings of every description as well as other places, in order to ascertain whether any of them are in a dangerous state. Such authorities shall have the power to take down and remove buildings, walls, and superstructures that may become insecure or dangerous, and to require the owner of insecure or dangerous buildings, walls, and other erections to remove or render the same secure and safe at the cost of the owner of such property. Such authorities shall have the power to regulate and prescribe the manner and order the building of party, parapet, and fire-walls and party-fences, and to regulate and prescribe the construction and building of chimneys, smokestacks, and smoke and hot-air flues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 2967, 2968, 2969; 1906, §§ 3352, 3363, 3364; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5849, 5860, 5861; 1930, §§ 2428, 2440, 2441; 1942, §§ 3374-140, 3374-149, 3374-150; Laws, 1938, ch. 331; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 140, 149, 150, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-23.
Entering mutual assistance pacts with other municipalities.

The governing authorities of municipalities may enter into mutual assistance pacts or agreements with other municipalities in the assignment of personnel, equipment, supplies and material for the purposes of combatting fires and natural and enemy disasters, and of preventing and alleviating riots or civil disturbances of the peace and tranquility within such municipalities. This section shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3470; Laws, 1942, ch. 227; Laws, 1958, ch. 510; Laws, 1964, ch. 502, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 25, 1964).

§ 21-19-25.
Adoption, amendment and revision of building and other codes.

Any municipality within the State of Mississippi may, in the discretion of its governing authority, adopt building codes, plumbing codes, electrical codes, gas codes, sanitary codes, or any other codes dealing with general public health, safety or welfare, or a combination of the same, by ordinance, in the manner prescribed in this section. Before any such code shall be adopted, it shall be either printed or typewritten, and it shall be presented in pamphlet form to the governing authority of the municipality at a regular meeting. The ordinance adopting the code shall not set out the code in full, but shall merely identify the same. The vote on passage of the ordinance shall be the same as on any other ordinances. After its adoption, the code shall be certified to by the mayor and clerk of the municipality, and shall be filed as a permanent record in the office of the clerk, who shall not be required to transcribe and record the same in the ordinance book as other ordinances. It shall not be necessary that the ordinance adopting the code or the code itself be published in full, but notice of the adoption of the code shall be given by publication in some newspaper of the municipality for one (1) time, or if there be no such newspaper, by posting at three (3) or more public places within the corporate limits, a notice in substantially the following form:

Notice is given that the city (or town or village) of_______________ , on the (give date of ordinance adopting code), adopted (state type of code and other information serving to identify the same) code.

If the governing authority of any municipality adopts or has adopted construction codes which do not have proper provisions to maintain up-to-date amendments, specifications in such codes for cements used in portland cement concrete shall be superseded by nationally recognized specifications referenced in any code adopted by the Mississippi Building Code Council.

All the provisions of this section shall apply to amendments and revisions of the code mentioned in this section. Any code adopted in accordance with this section shall not be in force for one (1) month after its passage, unless the municipal authorities in the ordinance authorize to the contrary. The provisions of this section shall be in addition and supplemental to any existing laws authorizing the adoption, amendment or revision of municipal ordinances or codes.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, any code adopted by a municipality before or after April 12, 2001, is subject to the provisions of Section 41-26-14(10).

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the governing authorities of each municipality in Jackson, Harrison, Hancock, Stone and Pearl River Counties shall enforce the requirements imposed under Section 17-2-1 as provided in such section.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under the code charter, a special charter, commission form, or other form of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-80, 3374-81; Laws, 1946, ch. 438; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 80, 81; Laws, 2001, ch. 587, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 7; Laws, 2008, ch. 379, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008.).

§ 21-19-27.
Compelling erection of barriers.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to compel owners of property adjacent to walks and ways to erect and maintain railings, safeguards, and barriers along the same in all cases where construction, repair, or other building activities on such premises create a dangerous or hazardous condition, and in all other cases where danger or hazard is created by the act of the property owner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2929; 1906, § 3320; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5817; 1930, § 2397; 1942, § 3374-117; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 117, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-29.
Regulating ingress and egress of buildings.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to regulate the entrances to public halls, churches, and buildings, and the way of ingress and egress to and from the same.

HISTORY:
Codes 1892, § 2966; 1906, § 3362; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5859; 1930, § 2439; 1942, § 3374-148; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 148, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-31.
Regulation of public places, depots and common carriers.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to regulate parks, public grounds, depots, depot grounds, and places for storage of freight and goods within the corporate limits. Said authorities shall have the power to compel railroads and other common carriers of passengers to furnish and maintain sanitary water toilets, where the municipality has a waterworks system, the facilities of which are available to said railroad or other common carrier, and in other cases to have a sanitary toilet, in their depots or stations. Said authorities shall have the power to provide for and regulate the construction and passage of railways and street railroads through the streets, avenues, alleys, lanes, and public grounds of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2931; 1906, § 3322; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5819; 1930, § 2399; 1942, § 3374-118; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 118, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-33.
Regulations of circuses, shows, theaters, and other amusements.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to adopt reasonable ordinances for the regulation of circuses, shows, theaters, bowling alleys, concerts, theatrical exhibitions, skating rinks, pistol or shooting galleries, amusement parks and devices, and other similar things. Said authorities shall have the power and authority to regulate, prohibit, or suppress billiard tables, poolrooms, fortune-tellers, cane or knife racks, and slot machines and other gambling devices within the corporate limits. However, such governing authorities shall not be authorized to regulate, prohibit or suppress any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired or transported within the corporate limits in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 97-33-7 or Section 75-76-34. In addition, such governing authorities shall not be authorized to regulate, prohibit or suppress the ownership and display of antique coin machines as defined in Section 27-27-12.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2949; 1906, § 3340; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5837; 1930, § 2416; 1942, § 3374-131; Laws, 1910, ch. 200; Laws, 1922, ch. 124; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 131; Laws, 1960, ch. 426; Laws, 1990, ch. 573, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 543, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 371, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 21-19-35.
Regulation of transient vendors and photographers; power of counties and municipalities; application of county and municipal ordinances.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to adopt reasonable ordinances for the regulation of transient vendors not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 75-85-1 through 75-85-19. However, said authorities shall not have the power to declare residential solicitations by transient vendors who are citizens of the State of Mississippi, or who are agents of corporations domiciled in the State of Mississippi, or who are agents of foreign corporations qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi, to be a public nuisance or a misdemeanor, unless said transient vendors are not in compliance with Sections 75-85-1 through 75-85-19 or local regulations. Before transacting any business, all transient vendors shall furnish to the municipality wherein said business is to be transacted, a good and sufficient penal bond in an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) conditioned that if said transient vendor shall comply with all of the provisions of the municipal ordinances relating to transient vendors said obligation shall be void, otherwise, to remain in full force and effect. Any ordinance adopted by the governing authority of a municipality under the provisions of this section shall control as to the area within such municipality, regardless of the existence of a county ordinance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2949; 1906, § 3340; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5837; 1930, § 2416; 1942, § 3374-131; Laws, 1910, ch. 200; Laws, 1922, ch. 124; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 131; Laws, 1960, ch. 426; Laws, 1983, ch. 517; Laws, 1988, ch. 581, § 11; Laws, 1994, ch. 522, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-19-37.
Regulation of “going-out-of-business” sales, “fire” sales, and similar sales.

The governing authorities of any municipality within this state are hereby authorized and empowered to adopt ordinances in the manner now provided by law to regulate the sale of goods, wares, or merchandise within the corporate limits of such municipality, subject to the provisions hereinafter named.

Such governing body is hereby authorized and empowered to enact an ordinance requiring any person, firm, or corporation desiring to conduct a sale commonly known as bankruptcy, insolvent, liquidation, assignee’s, receiver’s, trustee’s, adjuster’s, wholesale, manufacturer’s, or closing-out sale, or a sale of goods damaged by fire, smoke, or water, or otherwise, to file with such governing authorities a petition for the privilege of conducting such sale, showing:

the nature of the sale and the length of time required by the petitioner for conducting said sale;

whether or not it is the purpose of said petitioner to replenish his stock of goods, wares, and merchandise during the course of the sale, and to what extent it is proposed to replenish said stock;

the place of sale and approximate value of goods to be sold.

Such governing authorities may provide for a privilege tax in any sum not in excess of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for the privilege of conducting such sale, and may provide that such privilege tax shall be good and valid only for the conduct of a sale of goods in the manner and at the time and place set forth and prescribed in the application for the privilege of conducting such sale.

Nothing in this section, however, shall be construed to authorize and empower municipal governing authorities to enact any ordinances to prevent or to interfere with any sale made by a trustee under a deed of trust or an assignment, or by sheriffs, constables, or other public or court officials, or by any other person or persons acting under the authority and/or direction of any court in the course of official duty, or by any duly licensed bona fide merchant of such municipality conducting a seasonal or special sale ordinarily conducted by merchants, or by any bona fide merchant who is closing out his stock of goods and advertises such sale to that effect, or by a bona fide merchant whose own stock of goods has been damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, and who advertises as such.

Such municipal governing authorities may, by ordinance, prescribe penalties for the violation of such ordinance and may make such violation of said ordinances punishable in the manner provided by law for the punishment of misdemeanors.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under the code charter, a special charter, commission form, or other form of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-79, 3374-81; Laws, 1932, ch. 218; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 79, 81, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-39.
Adoption of ordinances regulating sale at retail of goods and services on Sunday.

From and after July 1, 1986, the governing authorities of counties and municipalities may adopt, in the manner provided by law, ordinances regulating, restricting and prohibiting the sale of goods and services at retail on the day of the week commonly called “Sunday.” Such ordinances may regulate, restrict or prohibit such sales by types and kinds of goods and services and may also regulate and restrict the hours during which such goods and services may be sold or offered for sale.

All valid ordinances of any county or municipality regulating, restricting or prohibiting the sale of goods and services on Sunday adopted prior to July 1, 1986, pursuant to the authority granted by and in conformity with the provisions of any of the laws amended or repealed by Chapter 302, Laws of 1986, shall be and the same are hereby declared to be null and void from and after July 1, 1986; provided, however, any ordinance adopted under the provisions of any other laws of this state shall not be affected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3372; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5869; 1930, § 2450; 1942, § 3374-154; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 154; Laws, 1986, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986 (became law on February 4, 1986, without the Governor’s signature).

§ 21-19-41.
Contributing to support of federal food stamp program.

Municipalities within the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized to contribute funds to the support of the federal food stamp program, operated under the direction of the United States Department of Agriculture, and administered in the State of Mississippi by the state department of public welfare. Contributions to the support of the federal food stamp program may be made by municipalities from general funds or from the proceeds of municipal sales taxes. However, no municipality shall establish a federal food stamp program where the county in which said municipality is situated has such a program in operation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-191; Laws, 1968, ch. 554, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 2, 1968).

§ 21-19-43.
Encouraging establishment of industry.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to aid and encourage the establishment of manufactures and other new enterprises mentioned in Section 27-31-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, and gas works, water works, and cooperative rural electrification associations, but not railroads, within the corporate limits of municipalities, by exempting all tangible property used in or necessary to the operation thereof for such purposes from municipal taxation for a period not exceeding ten years as authorized by Sections 27-31-101 and 27-31-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, and as authorized by Section 192 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2956; 1906, § 3347; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5844; 1930, § 2423; 1942, § 3374-136; Laws, 1920, ch. 236; Laws, 1932, ch. 221; Laws, 1938, ch. 336; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 136; Laws, 1952, ch. 420, § 8.

§ 21-19-44.
Supporting certain local economic development organizations.

The municipal governing authorities of any municipality shall have the power and authority, in their discretion, to execute contracts and agreements with, and to appropriate, contribute and donate to, or expend budgeted funds for, local economic development organizations and designated Main Street programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 21-19-44.1.
Donating to Main Street Project, Incorporated.

The governing authorities of any municipality in this state are authorized, in their discretion, to contribute, donate or appropriate annually out of any money in the treasury of the municipality, to the municipality’s nonprofit corporation known as Main Street Project, Incorporated, for any economic development program or endeavor of the corporation, for the development of the municipality’s central business district or for any lawful purpose of the municipality. Further, the governing authorities are authorized, in their discretion, to execute contracts and agreements and to expend municipal funds in support of any project sponsored by the corporation, the municipality or any other nonprofit corporation engaged in local economic development.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 322, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 1999.).

§ 21-19-45.
Donating to nonprofit civic and development corporations by certain municipalities.

Any municipality in the state having a population of less than five hundred according to the 1960 decennial census and being situated in a county bordering the State of Tennessee and having a 1960 population in excess of fifteen thousand but less than twenty thousand, and any municipality having a population according to the 1960 federal decennial census in excess of two thousand but less than two thousand two hundred and being in a county bordering the Pearl River and having an area in excess of eight hundred twenty-five square miles, and all municipalities located in counties with two judicial districts in which municipalities Mississippi Highway 35 runs and which have a population according to the latest available federal census in excess of three hundred forty-two but less than one thousand, acting by and through the mayor and board of aldermen, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to pay a sum not to exceed Two Hundred Twenty-Five Dollars ($225.00) per month to any nonprofit civic and development corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Mississippi for the purposes set forth herein.

The funds shall be expended by said nonprofit corporation for the purpose of building, equipping, maintaining and operating a community park, a community house, tennis courts, bowling lanes, lakes, golf courses and swimming pools, for the acquisition of land and facilities to be used for the aforesaid purposes, for the purchase of land and the making of improvements thereon for industrial development, and for other public purposes, and for the repayment of loans secured for the purposes set forth herein.

This section, without reference to any other statutes, shall be full and complete authority to expend the money for the purposes enumerated herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised by the mayor and board of aldermen in order to carry out the purposes of this section are herein expressly conferred on said mayor and board.

The mayor and board of aldermen are further authorized and empowered to adopt any and all lawful resolutions, orders, and/or ordinances, and to do and perform any and all acts and things necessary and requisite to carry out the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-125.3; Laws, 1964, ch. 499, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1966 Ex Sess, ch. 43, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 551, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 10, 1968).

§ 21-19-46.
Donating to Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASA).

The governing authority of any municipality is authorized, in its discretion, to donate to any chapter of the Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASA) out of any funds in the municipal treasury; however, the cumulative sum of donations to a chapter may not exceed the amount generated in the municipality by one-fourth (1/4) mill on all of the taxable property within the municipality during the fiscal year in which the donations are made.Nothing in this section authorizes the imposition of additional tax.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 21-19-47.
Donating to support bands and orchestras.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to appropriate funds each year in the amount that they may deem advisable, to be paid out of the treasury of such municipalities, toward aiding, supporting and maintaining a band or concert orchestra for the amusement and entertainment of the citizens of such municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5871; 1930, § 2451; 1942, § 3374-155; Laws, 1912, ch. 122; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 155; Laws, 1977, ch. 382, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1977).

§ 21-19-49.
Appropriation of funds or conveyance of buildings and property to school districts by local governments; contracts for provision of additional police protection for schools; off-duty law enforcement officers authorized to use public uniforms and equipment for school security purposes; municipalities authorized to donate to public school districts for certain purposes.

The governing authority of any municipality or the board of supervisors of any county are hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate money or dedicate and convey municipally-owned buildings and property or county-owned buildings and property, as the case may be, to the school district or districts situated within that municipality or county for the purpose of erecting, purchasing or otherwise providing the school building or a site for such school building of such school district, in cases where the governing authority or board of supervisors are of the opinion that the location of such school building within the corporate limits of the municipality or the county, or in close proximity thereto, will be of special benefit to the inhabitants of the municipality or county.

Municipalities, municipal police departments and the sheriffs’ departments may contract with the school board of any school district to provide additional Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy-certified police protection to said school district on such terms and for such reimbursement as the school district and the entity may agree in their discretion.

The governing authority of any municipality or the board of supervisors of any county may allow off-duty municipal or county law enforcement officers who are hired individually for security purposes by the school district or districts within that municipality or county to use municipal or county law enforcement uniforms and equipment during such off-duty employment.

The governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may donate funds, equipment or in-kind services to any school district located within the boundaries of the municipality to assist the voluntary character development or public service programs of that school district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2553; 1942, § 3374-156; Laws, 1928, Ex. ch. 39; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 156; Laws, 1996, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 21-19-51.
Donating to fair associations.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority, in their discretion, to contribute, appropriate or donate to fair associations, domiciled in their respective county, a sum of money not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per annum for the purpose of advertising, displaying, exhibiting or promoting the agricultural or industrial resources of such municipality or its respective county. The expenditure of such money, when contributed, appropriated or donated, shall be under the control of the municipality, and such governing authorities are hereby authorized and empowered to appoint one or as many as three individuals, in their discretion, to represent the municipal authorities in the proper expenditure of such money for said purpose in conjunction with the fair association. Before contributing, appropriating or donating any money to any fair association, such governing authorities shall publish notice of their intention to contribute, appropriate or donate money to said fair association, giving the amount of, and the date of making said contribution, appropriation or donation, in some newspaper published in the municipality, or having a general circulation therein if none be there published, for three weeks ending not less than ten days prior to the making of any contribution, appropriation or donation. If, before the making of said contribution, appropriation or donation, twenty per centum of the adult taxpayers of the municipality shall petition against such contribution, appropriation or donation, then the said contribution, appropriation or donation shall not be made, unless authorized by a majority of the electors voting in an election to be ordered for that purpose. All of the expenses of publishing the notice herein provided for and of holding any election hereunder shall be paid out of the municipal treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069e; 1930, § 2460; 1942, § 3374-157; Laws, 1918, ch. 200; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 157, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-53.
Donating to support historical museums by certain municipalities.

The mayor and board of aldermen of any municipality wherein there is located an historic museum operated by an historical society on a nonprofit basis and which municipality is situated in a county bordered by the Mississippi River and having therein a national military park and a national military cemetery are hereby authorized and empowered to donate a sum not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per annum to such historic museum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-157.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 355.

§ 21-19-55.
Donating to patriotic organizations.

The council or board of aldermen of any municipality in the state is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to donate a sum not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to build or aid any post of the American Legion or the chapter of the Daughters of the American Revolution, any chapter of the United Daughters of the Confederacy, or any post, unit or chapter of any patriotic organization within the county in building a memorial to the veterans of World Wars I and II, and a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) to aid in defraying the cost of the erection of suitable memorials to deceased soldiers, sailors, and marines of the late world wars. Such appropriation may be made even though no provision has been made therefor in the municipal budget.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3798, 3810, 3811; Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3811c; 1930, § 290; 1942, § 2998; Laws, 1908, ch. 134; Laws, 1916, chs. 143, 235; Laws, 1918, ch. 205; Laws, 1920, ch. 289; Laws, 1922, ch. 302; Laws, 1924, chs. 217, 222; Laws, 1926, chs. 204, 212, 305, 306; Laws, 1928, chs. 233, 236; Laws, 1930, chs. 33, 56, 185; Laws, 1938, chs. 299, 326; Laws, 1956, ch. 181; Laws, 1958, ch. 212; Laws, 1962, ch. 251, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 21-19-57.
Donating to American Red Cross.

Any mayor and board of commissioners of any city and/or any mayor and board of aldermen of any municipality in this state, are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to donate annually, out of any moneys in the municipal treasury, to be drawn by warrant thereon, a sum not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per million of assessed valuation to the support of a local chapter of the American Red Cross, in said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3798, 3810, 3811; Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3811c; 1930, § 290; 1942, § 2998; Laws, 1908, ch. 134; Laws, 1916, chs. 143, 235; Laws, 1918, ch. 205; Laws, 1920, ch. 289; Laws, 1922, ch. 302; Laws, 1924, chs. 217, 222; Laws, 1926, chs. 204, 212, 305, 306; Laws, 1928, chs. 233, 236; Laws, 1930, chs. 33, 56, 185; Laws, 1938, chs. 299, 326; Laws, 1956, ch. 181; Laws, 1958, ch. 212; Laws, 1962, ch. 251, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 21-19-58.
Donating to Mississippi Burn Care Fund.

The board of supervisors of any county, and the governing authorities of any municipality in the state, are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to make contributions to the Mississippi Department of Health, or the University of Mississippi Medical Center after the Mississippi Burn Center is operational, for deposit to the Mississippi Burn Care Fund from the general fund or federal revenue sharing funds of such county or municipality wherein such funds may be available.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 450; Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 47, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 569, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 21-19-59.
Donating to state colleges or universities for support of airport by certain municipalities.

Every municipality of this state, in or near which a state university or other state-supported four-year college is now or hereafter may be located, in which there has been constructed or is contemplated, an airport for use by said university or college, as the case may be, may, in the discretion of its governing authorities, contribute funds and aid and assist by the donation of lands, furnishing of materials and labor, use of general municipal operating funds, or otherwise, in acquiring a site, erecting suitable buildings, and constructing, equipping, maintaining and operating an airport for use by the university or college, as the case may be, and for use by the general public in said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2923; 1906, § 3314; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5811; 1930, § 2391; 1942, § 3374-112; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 112; Laws, 1957, Ex. ch. 13, § 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 425; Laws, 1966, ch. 592, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).